North Carolina, session 2025, HB531.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated for the North Carolina New Teacher Support
Program (Program) to increase participation in the Program by qualifying new teacher graduates
without additional cost to local school administrative units. First priority for receipt of these funds
shall be for qualifying new teacher graduates working in local school administrative units located
in a county that is designated as a development tier one area in the annual ranking performed by
the Department of Commerce pursuant to G.S. 143B-437.08. For purposes of this section, the
term "qualifying new teacher graduate" shall refer to persons teaching in North Carolina public
schools who meet one of the following criteria:
(1) Hold one of the following types of alternative teaching licenses:
a. An emergency license.
b. A residency license.
c. A permit to teach issued by the Department of Public Instruction in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2) Are graduates of a recognized educator preparation program at a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina.
SECTION 2. The funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act shall be used in
programs designed to address the specific needs of teachers with alternative teaching licensure
who will begin their teaching careers in North Carolina public schools through a blended model
of support to include:
(1) Participation in a beginning teacher summit hosted by the North Carolina New
Teacher Support Program, a professional conference event for early career
educators.
(2) An assigned instructional coach familiar with the region and local school
context to guide improvements in the proficiency of teachers in planning,
instruction, and assessment.
(3) Access to and participation in ongoing, career-embedded professional
development to meet their emerging needs with consideration of their
professional context.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 531-First Edition